District of Columbia statutes.
8-2035

Rules.

Within 180 days of March 16, 1989, the Mayor shall promulgate proposed rules, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The proposed rules shall include guidelines, applicable to owners and tenants of locally assisted housing accommodations, on keeping common household pets, pet size, types of pets, potential financial obligation of tenants, and standards of pet care. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-181, § 6, 35 DCR 7715
This section is referenced in § 8-2033.
2001 Ed., § 8-2205.
1981 Ed., § 6-1025.